Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB458.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b)(12) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (12) Notes and working papers prepared by or for a public official or agency employee used:(i) solely for that official's or employee's own personal use, including telephone message slips, routing slips and other materials that do not have an official purpose[.]; or(ii) to accommodate an individual's disability, including transcriptions, braille translations or large print materials.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0458PN0389 - 2 - 1234567891011